Nevada, session 83, AB224.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in a total face amount of not
more than $100,000,000 pursuant to NRS 349.150 to 349.364,
inclusive. The proceeds of the bonds issued pursuant to this section
must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Fund to
Assist School Districts in Financing Capital Improvements created
pursuant to NRS 387.333 and used by the Director of the Office of
Finance to make grants pursuant to NRS 387.3335 to school
districts in a county whose population is less than 15,000.
2. As used in this section, “proceeds” means amounts received
from the sale of an issue of the general obligation bonds and any
accrued interest thereon.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)